Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 1. Definitions; Property Abandoned or Assumed Abandoned.

§ 55.1-2500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Act”
means the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.).

“Administrator”
means the State Treasurer or his designee.

“Apparent owner”
means the person whose name appears on the records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued, or owing by the holder.

“Banking organization”
means any bank, trust company, savings bank (industrial bank, land bank, safe deposit company), or private banker or any other organization defined by law as a bank or banking organization.

“Business association”
means any corporation, joint-stock company, investment company, business trust, partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, or association for business purposes of two or more individuals, whether or not for profit, including a banking organization, financial organization, insurance company, or utility.

“Credit balance”
means an item of intangible property resulting from or attributable to the sale of goods or services, including an overpayment, credit memo, refund, discount, rebate, unidentified remittance, or deposit.

“Domicile”
means (i) the state of incorporation, in the case of a corporation incorporated under the laws of a state; (ii) the state of organization, in the case of an unincorporated business association formed under the laws of a state; (iii) the state of the principal place of business, in the case of a nonnatural person not incorporated or formed under the laws of a state; and (iv) the state of principal residency, in the case of a natural person.

“Due diligence”
includes the mailing of a letter by first-class mail to the last known address of the owner as indicated on the records of the holder.

“Financial organization”
means any savings and loan association (cooperative bank), building and loan association, or credit union.

“Gift certificate”
means a certificate, electronic card, or other medium that evidences the giving of consideration in exchange for the right to redeem the certificate, electronic card, or other medium for goods, food, services, credit, or money of an equal value.

“Holder”
means a person, wherever organized or domiciled, that is (i) in possession of property belonging to another; (ii) a trustee, in the case of a trust; or (iii) indebted to another on an obligation.

“Insurance company”
means an association, corporation, or fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, that is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including accident, burial, casualty, contract performance, credit life, dental, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life (including endowments and annuities), malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, and wage protection insurance.

“Intangible property”
includes (i) moneys, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, and dividend income; (ii) credits, customer overpayments, gift certificates, security deposits, refunds, unpaid wages, and unidentified remittances; (iii) stocks and other intangible ownership interests in business associations; (iv) moneys deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other securities or to make distributions; (v) amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies; and (vi) amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide any health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefit.

“Last known address”
means a description of the location of the apparent owner sufficient to identify the state of residence of the apparent owner for the purpose of the delivery of mail.

“Owner”
means (i) a depositor, in the case of a deposit; (ii) a beneficiary, in the case of a trust, other than a deposit in trust; (iii) a creditor, claimant, or payee, in the case of other intangible property; or (iv) a person having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to this chapter or his legal representative.

“Payable”
means the earliest date upon which the owner of property could become entitled to the payments, possession, delivery, or distribution of such property from a holder.

“Person”
means an individual; a business association; a government or governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation, or public authority; an estate; a trust; two or more persons having a joint or common interest; or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Promotional incentive”
means a coupon, rebate, or other promotional device offered to induce a consumer to purchase goods, food, or services and for which (i) no direct consideration is given by the consumer or (ii) the consideration given is less than the value of the goods, food, or services to be received.

“State,”
when applied to a part of the United States, includes any state, district, commonwealth, territory, and insular possession and any other area subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

“Unclaimed property”
means property for which the owner, as shown by the records of the holder of his property, has ceased, failed, or neglected, within the times provided in this chapter, to make presentment and demand for payment and satisfaction or to do any other act in relation to or concerning such property. As used in this definition, “act” excludes any act of a holder of unclaimed property not done at the express request or authorization of the owner.

“Utility”
means a person that owns or operates, for public use, any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for the transmission of communications or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas.

History.

1960, c. 330, § 55-210.2; 1981, c. 47; 1982, c. 331; 1983, c. 190; 1984, c. 121; 1988, c. 378; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to exclusions under Virginia Freedom of Information Act for records of public bodies, see §

2.2-3705.7

.

As to disposal of unclaimed property in possession of sheriff or police, see §

15.2-1719

.

As to disposal of unclaimed firearms or other weapons in possession of sheriff or police, see §

15.2-1721

.

As to disposal of unclaimed firearms in possession of Division of Capitol Police, see § 30-34.2:2.

As to disposal of unclaimed property in possession of State Police, see §

52-11.4

. As to disposal of unclaimed firearms or other weapons in possession of State Police, see §

52-11.5

.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

District of Columbia: D.C. Code §§ 41-101 to 41-142.

Florida: Fla. Stat. §§ 717.001 to 717.1401.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. §§ 44-12-190 to 44-12-236.

Iowa: Iowa Code §§ 556.1 to 556.30.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 345.31 to 345.60.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. §§ 89-12-1 to 89-12-57.

Missouri: §§ 447.500 to 447.595 R.S.Mo.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. §§ 69-1301 to 69-1329.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 120A.010 to 120A.450.

Oregon: O.R.S. §§ 98.302 to 98.436.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 66-29-101 through 66-29-153.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Issues of Sovereignty in Escheat and the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act,” see 40 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1429 (1983).

For note, “Virginia’s Acquisition of Unclaimed and Abandoned Personal Property,” see 27 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1986).

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Lost Property, § 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Unclaimed funds of former inmates. —

Unclaimed funds belonging to former inmates of a jail who were released prior to the closing of the jail, where their forwarding addresses are invalid and current addresses are unknown, that are presently held by the Sheriff’s Office in the inmate trust account constitute abandoned property that should be reported and remitted forthwith to the State Treasurer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Vanessa R. Crawford, Sheriff, City of Petersburg, No. 16-047, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 6, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/20/17).

§ 55.1-2501.
Property presumed abandoned; general rule.

All tangible and intangible property, including any income or increment thereon, less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after it became payable is presumed abandoned, except as otherwise provided by this chapter. Property is payable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the owner’s failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document required to receive payment.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.2:1; 1985, c. 294; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2502.
Taking custody of intangible unclaimed property; general rules.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by other law of the Commonwealth, intangible property is subject to the custody of the Commonwealth as unclaimed property if the conditions leading to a presumption of abandonment as described in §§

55.1-2501

,

55.1-2503

, and

55.1-2505

through

55.1-2521

are satisfied and:

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in the Commonwealth;

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property, and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in the Commonwealth;

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner, and it is established that (i) the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in the Commonwealth or (ii) the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of the Commonwealth and has not previously paid the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property;

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property, and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of the Commonwealth;

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a foreign nation, and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of the Commonwealth; or

The transaction out of which the property arose occurred in the Commonwealth, and (i) the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown or (ii) the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property; and

The holder is a domiciliary of a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.2:2; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Unclaimed funds of former inmates. —

Unclaimed funds belonging to former inmates of a jail who were released prior to the closing of the jail, where their forwarding addresses are invalid and current addresses are unknown, that are presently held by the Sheriff’s Office in the inmate trust account constitute abandoned property that should be reported and remitted forthwith to the State Treasurer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Vanessa R. Crawford, Sheriff, City of Petersburg, No. 16-047, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 6, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/20/17).

§ 55.1-2503.
Bank deposits and funds in financial organizations.

Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a banking or financial organization, including deposits that are automatically renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase of shares, a mutual investment certificate, or any other interest in a banking or financial organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner has, within five years:

In the case of a deposit or ownership of shares, increased or decreased the amount of the deposit or the number of shares owned, or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit or ownership of shares for the crediting of interest or dividends, or negotiated a check in payment of interest or dividends on a time deposit or ownership of shares;

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the property;

Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization;

Owned other property to which subdivision 1, 2, or 3 is applicable if the banking or financial organization communicated in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this section at the address to which communications regarding the other property regularly are sent;

Had another relationship with the banking or financial organization concerning which the owner has (i) communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization, or (ii) otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization if the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be abandoned under this section at the address to which communications regarding the other relationship regularly are sent; or

A deposit made with or purchase of shares in a banking or financial organization by a court or by a guardian pursuant to an order of a court or by any other person for the benefit of a person who was an infant at the time of the making of such deposit or purchase of shares, which deposit or ownership of shares is subject to withdrawal or transfer only upon the further order of such court or such guardian or other person, shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter until one year after such infant attains the age of 18 years or until one year after the death of such infant, whichever occurs sooner. These accounts are not subject to dormant service charges.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, share accounts of a member of a state or federally chartered credit union that is subject to or covered by life savings insurance provided by the credit union at no additional charge to the member shall be presumed abandoned five years after the date of the second mailing of a statement of account or other notification or communication that was returned as undeliverable or five years after the date the credit union discontinued the mailings to the member, whichever occurs earlier. Funds held or owing under the life savings insurance policy are presumed abandoned pursuant to §

55.1-2507

.

For purposes of this section, “property” includes any interest or dividends thereon. No banking or financial organization may deduct any service charge or cease to accrue interest on any account from the date the account is declared dormant or inactive by such organization except in conformity with cessation of interest or service charges generally assessed upon active accounts and except as provided in this section. With respect to any property described in this section, a holder may not impose any charges due to dormancy or inactivity that differ from charges imposed on active accounts or cease to pay interest due to dormancy or inactivity that differs from the cessation of payment of interest on active accounts unless:

There is an enforceable contract between the holder and the owner of the property pursuant to which the holder may impose those charges or cease payment of interest;

For property in excess of $100, the holder, no more than three months prior to the initial imposition of those charges or cessation of interest, has given written notice to the owner of the amount of those charges at the last known address of the owner stating that those charges will be imposed or that interest will cease; however, such notice need not be given with respect to charges imposed or interest ceased before July 1, 1984;

When the holder receives a request from the owner of the property to reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest with respect to such property, the holder may at its option either:

Reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest with respect to any such property, in which event the holder shall reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest for all such property that becomes subject to the reporting requirements in §

55.1-2524

for the Department of the Treasury; or

Not reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest with respect to any such property, in which event the holder shall not be required to reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest for any such property that becomes subject to the reporting requirements in §

55.1-2524

for the Department of the Treasury; and

Any automatically renewable property to which this section applies is matured upon the expiration of its initial time period. However, in the case of any renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with the banking or financial organization or otherwise indicates consent as specified in subsection A, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in subsection D of §

55.1-2524

, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would result. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, any automatically renewable time deposit that has matured shall be presumed abandoned five years after the date of the second mailing of a statement of account or other notification or communication that was returned as undeliverable or five years after the date the holder discontinued the mailings to the apparent owner, whichever occurs earlier. However, any automatically renewable time deposit for which no such statement or other notification or mailing is required to be sent by the banking or financial organization shall be presumed abandoned as otherwise provided in this section.

4.

The holder may at its option reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest with respect to any or all such property to correct a documented internal error without becoming required to reverse or cancel dormancy charges or retroactively credit interest for all such property that becomes subject to the reporting requirements in §

55.1-2524

for the Department of the Treasury.Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the contrary, a holder that is a state-chartered credit union may refund charges or reverse or cancel those charges or retroactively credit interest with respect to such property to the same extent that a federally chartered credit union is authorized to do so pursuant to applicable provisions of federal law.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.3:01; 1985, c. 294; 1991, c. 357; 1995, c. 624; 1996, c. 419; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2008, cc. 90, 556; 2018, cc. 359, 439; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 359 and 439, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2504.
Traveler’s checks and money orders.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any sum payable on a traveler’s check that has been outstanding for more than 15 years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within 15 years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.Except as otherwise provided in this section, any sum payable on a money order or similar written instrument, other than a third-party bank check, that has been outstanding for more than seven years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within seven years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

No holder may deduct from the amount of any traveler’s check or money order any charges imposed by reason of the failure to present those instruments for payment unless (i) there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the issuer and the owner of the property pursuant to which the issuer may impose those charges and (ii) the issuer regularly imposes those charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel those charges with respect to such property.

Any sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument, other than a third-party bank check, described in this section shall not be subjected to the custody of the Commonwealth as unclaimed property unless:

The records of the issuer show that the traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased in the Commonwealth;

The issuer has its principal place of business in the Commonwealth, and the records of the issuer do not show the state in which the traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased; or

The issuer has its principal place of business in the Commonwealth, the records of the issuer show the state in which the traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased, and the laws of the state of purchase do not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of subsection C relating to the requirements for subjecting certain written instruments to the custody of the Commonwealth apply to sums payable on traveler’s checks, money orders, and similar written instruments presumed abandoned on or after February 1, 1965, except to the extent that those sums have been paid over to a state prior to January 1, 1974.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.3:02; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2505.
Checks, drafts, and similar instruments issued or certified by banking and financial organizations.

Any sum payable on a check, draft, or similar instrument, except money orders, traveler’s checks, and other similar instruments subject to §

55.1-2504

, on which a banking or financial organization is directly liable, including cashier’s checks and certified checks, that has been outstanding for more than five years after it was payable, or after its issuance if payable on demand, is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within five years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of any instrument subject to this section any charges imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the holder may impose those charges and the holder regularly imposes those charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel those charges with respect to such instruments.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.3:2; 1985, c. 294; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Unclaimed funds of former inmates. —

Unclaimed funds belonging to former inmates of a jail who were released prior to the closing of the jail, where their forwarding addresses are invalid and current addresses are unknown, that are presently held by the Sheriff’s Office in the inmate trust account constitute abandoned property that should be reported and remitted forthwith to the State Treasurer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Vanessa R. Crawford, Sheriff, City of Petersburg, No. 16-047, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 6, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/20/17).

§ 55.1-2506.
Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

All tangible and intangible property held in a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in the Commonwealth in the ordinary course of the holder’s business and all proceeds resulting from the lawful sale of this property shall be presumed abandoned if unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after the lease or rental period on the box or other repository has expired.

History.

1985, c. 294, § 55-210.3:3; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2507.
Funds owing under life insurance policies.

Funds held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract that has matured or terminated are presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than five years after the funds became due and payable as established from the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds, except that property described in subdivision C 2 is presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than two years.

If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the funds and no address of the person is known to the company or it is not definite and certain from the records of the company who is entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the last known address of the person entitled to the funds is the same as the last known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company.

For purposes of this section, a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company is deemed matured and the proceeds due and payable if:

The company knows that the insured or annuitant has died; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if he were living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based; (ii) the policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or would have attained, the limiting age specified in clause (i); and (iii) neither the insured nor any other person appearing to have an interest in the policy within the preceding two years, according to the records of the company, has assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, corresponded in writing with the company concerning the policy, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the company.
2. (i) The insured has attained, or would have attained if he were living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based; (ii) the policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or would have attained, the limiting age specified in clause (i); and (iii) neither the insured nor any other person appearing to have an interest in the policy within the preceding two years, according to the records of the company, has assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, corresponded in writing with the company concerning the policy, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the company.

For purposes of this section, the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from being matured or terminated under subsection A if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiaries of the policy otherwise have become entitled to the proceeds thereof before the depletion of the cash surrender value of the policy by the application of those provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the company learns of the death of the insured or annuitant and the beneficiary has not communicated with the insurer within four months after the death, the company shall take reasonable steps to locate the beneficiary and pay the proceeds to the beneficiary.

Commencing July 1, 1986, every change of beneficiary form issued by an insurance company under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract to an insured or owner who is a resident of the Commonwealth shall request the following information:

The name of each beneficiary or, if the class of beneficiaries is named, the name of each current beneficiary in the class;

The address of each beneficiary; and

The relationship of each beneficiary to the insured.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.4:01; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2508.
Intangible personal property held by insurance corporation subject to § 55.1-2501.

An insurance corporation holding any other intangible personal property not covered by subsection A of §

55.1-2507

or §

55.1-2509

shall be otherwise subject to §

55.1-2501

.

History.

1981, c. 47, § 55-210.4:1; 2003, cc. 750, 765; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2509.
Unclaimed demutualization proceeds.

Unclaimed property payable or distributable in the course of the demutualization of an insurance company is presumed abandoned five years after the earlier of (i) the date of last contact with the policyholder or (ii) the date the property became payable or distributable. The report filed on November 1, 2003 will include demutualization distribution property for which there has been no policyholder contact for the five years prior to June 30, 2003.

History.

2003, cc. 750, 765, § 55-210.4:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2510.
Deposits held by utilities.

Any deposit, including any interest thereon, made by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment or any sum paid in advance for utility services to be furnished, less any lawful deductions, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after termination of the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made is presumed abandoned.

History.

1960, c. 330, § 55-210.5; 1981, c. 47; 1983, c. 190; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2511.
Intangible interest in business association.

Any intangible interest in a business association, as evidenced by the stock records or membership records of the association, is presumed abandoned five years after the date of the most recent dividend or other distribution unclaimed by the apparent owner with respect to the stock or other interest or, if a dividend or other distribution has not been paid on the stock or other interest, or the stock or other interest is held pursuant to a plan that provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends or other distributions, five years after the date of the second mailing of a statement of account or other notification or communication that was returned as undeliverable or five years after the date the holder discontinued the mailings to the apparent owner, whichever occurs earlier. With respect to such interest, the business association shall be deemed the holder.

Any dividend or other distribution held for or owing to a person at the time the stock or other security to which such dividend or other distribution attaches is considered abandoned at the same time.

History.

1970, c. 158, § 55-210.6:1; 1980, c. 293; 1981, c. 47; 1991, c. 357; 1995, c. 624; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to proceedings for determination of lost stockholders, and escheat of unclaimed shares and dividends, see §

13.1-777

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2512.
Refunds held by business associations.

Except to the extent otherwise ordered by a court or administrative agency of competent jurisdiction, any sum that a business association has been ordered to refund by a court or administrative agency that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after it became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund, regardless of whether the final determination or order requires any person entitled to a refund to make a claim for it, is presumed abandoned.

History.

1984, c. 121, § 55-210.6:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2513.
Property of business associations held in course of dissolution.

All intangible property distributable in the course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a business association that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after the date for specified final distribution is presumed abandoned.

History.

1960, c. 330, § 55-210.7; 1981, c. 47; 1983, c. 190; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to articles of termination of corporate existence, see §

13.1-750

. As to articles of termination of corporate existence, see §

13.1-912

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2514.
Intangible personal property held in fiduciary capacity.

All intangible personal property, and any income or increment thereon, held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person is presumed abandoned unless the owner has, within five years after it became payable, increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income, corresponded in writing concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with and prepared by the fiduciary or an employee of the fiduciary.

Funds in an individual retirement account, a retirement plan for self-employed individuals, or a similar account or plan established pursuant to the Internal Revenue laws of the United States are not payable under this section unless, under the terms of the account or plan, distribution of all or part of the funds would then be mandatory.

For the purpose of this section, a person who holds property as an agent for a business association is deemed to hold the property in a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless such person’s agreement with the business association provides otherwise. A person who is so deemed to hold property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, and the business association is the holder of the property insofar as the interest of any other person in the property is concerned.

History.

1960, c. 330, § 55-210.8; 1981, c. 47; 1982, c. 331; 1984, c. 121; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2515.
Gift certificates and credit balances.

Except as described in subsection B, a gift certificate or credit balance issued in the ordinary course of the issuer’s business that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after such gift certificate or credit balance became payable is presumed abandoned.

The following property is exempt from the provisions of this chapter and shall not be assessed by the administrator as unclaimed property: (i) credit balances payable to a business association; (ii) outstanding checks resulting from or attributable to the sale of goods or services to a business association; (iii) promotional incentives; and (iv) credits, gift certificates, coupons, layaways, and similar items, provided that such credits, gift certificates, coupons, layaways, and similar items are redeemable in merchandise, in services, or through future purchases.

History.

1983, c. 190, § 55-210.8:1; 1988, cc. 595, 643; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2516.
Wages.

Unpaid wages, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business, that have remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after such unpaid wages became payable are presumed abandoned.

History.

1983, c. 190, § 55-210.8:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2517.
Intangible property held for owner by public agency.

All intangible property held for the owner by any government or governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation, or public authority that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after it became payable is presumed abandoned.

History.

1960, c. 330, § 55-210.9; 1980, c. 293; 1982, c. 331; 1983, c. 190; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to the duty of the State Treasurer to report and remit all unpresented checks, see §

2.2-1811

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Unclaimed funds of former inmates. —

Unclaimed funds belonging to former inmates of a jail who were released prior to the closing of the jail, where their forwarding addresses are invalid and current addresses are unknown, that are presently held by the Sheriff’s Office in the inmate trust account constitute abandoned property that should be reported and remitted forthwith to the State Treasurer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Vanessa R. Crawford, Sheriff, City of Petersburg, No. 16-047, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 6, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/20/17).

§ 55.1-2518.
Property held by courts.

All intangible property held for the owner by any state or federal court that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after it became payable is presumed abandoned.

History.

1983, c. 190, § 55-210.9:1; 1985, c. 294; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to compensation and fees of general receiver, see §

8.01-589

. As to proceedings when owner of money under control of court is unknown, see §

8.01-602

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2519.
Responsibilities of general receiver and clerk.

The general receiver, if one has been appointed, and the clerk of each circuit court shall be responsible for identifying moneys held by them in their respective accounts that have remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after such moneys became payable and for petitioning the court to remit such money to the administrator. There shall be no obligation to report or remit funds deposited as compensation and damages in condemnation proceedings pursuant to §

25.1-237

prior to a final court order or pursuant to §

33.2-1019

.

History.

1988, c. 841, § 55-210.9:2; 2000, cc. 733, 745; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.